Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 4.1A, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 e. âGenderâ , when used alone in reference to males, females, 3 or the natural differences between males and females , shall 4 be considered a synonym for sex and shall not be considered 5 a synonym or shorthand expression for gender identity, 6 experienced gender, gender expression, or gender role. 7 Sec. 2. Section 4.1A, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 4. Any state department or subunit of a department, or any 10 political subdivision of the state including a city, county, 11 township, or school district , that collects vital statistics 12 for the purpose of complying with state antidiscrimination 13 laws, or for the purpose of gathering accurate state public 14 health, crime, economic, or other data, shall identify the sex 15 of each person included in the collected data as either male 16 or female. 17 Sec. 3. Section 8.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended to 18 read as follows: 19 3. The initiation and preparation of a balanced budget of 20 any and all revenues and expenditures for each regular session 21 of the legislature general assembly . 22 Sec. 4. Section 8.22, subsection 1, paragraph b, 23 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 (2) If the estimated revenues of the government for the 25 ensuing fiscal year as set forth in the budget on the basis of 26 existing laws, plus the estimated amounts in the treasury at 27 the close of the year in progress, available for expenditure in 28 the ensuing fiscal year are less than the aggregate recommended 29 for the ensuing fiscal year as contained in the budget, the 30 governor shall make recommendations to the legislature general 31 assembly in respect to the manner in which the deficit shall be 32 met, whether by an increase in the state tax or the imposition 33 of new taxes, increased rates on existing taxes, or otherwise, 34 and if the aggregate of the estimated revenues, plus estimated 35 -1- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 1/ 44 H.F. _____ balances in the treasury, is greater than the recommended 1 appropriations for the ensuing fiscal year, the governor shall 2 make recommendations in reference to the application of the 3 surplus to the reduction of debt or otherwise, to the reduction 4 in taxation, or to such other action as in the governorâs 5 opinion is in the interest of the public welfare. 6 Sec. 5. Section 8.57A, subsection 4, paragraphs b and c, 7 Code 2026, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 8 Sec. 6. Section 9F.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 9F.6 Population of counties, townships , and cities. 11 Whenever the population of any county, township , or city is 12 referred to in any law of this state, it shall be determined by 13 the last preceding certified federal census unless otherwise 14 provided. Whenever a special federal census is taken by any 15 city, the mayor and council shall certify the census as soon 16 as possible to the secretary of state and to the treasurer of 17 state as otherwise herein provided, and upon the failure to do 18 so, the treasurer of state shall, after six months from the 19 date of the special census, withhold allocation from the state 20 to the city of any moneys the amount of which is based on the 21 population of the city, and shall continue to do so until such 22 time as certification by the mayor and council is made, or 23 until the next decennial federal decennial census. If there be 24 is a difference between the original certified record in the 25 office of the secretary of state and the published census , the 26 former shall prevail. 27 Sec. 7. Section 12.51, subsection 2, paragraph b, 28 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, is 29 amended to read as follows: 30 (a) For each fiscal year for the period beginning July 1, 31 2025, and ending June 30, 2030, of the total amount of the 32 state portion of the moneys paid to the state as described in 33 paragraph âbâ subparagraph (1) and deposited in the fund, plus 34 any interest and earnings on moneys in the fund, seventy-five 35 -2- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 2/ 44 H.F. _____ percent is appropriated to the department and twenty-five 1 percent is appropriated to the office of the attorney general 2 for purposes of abating the opioid crisis in this state. 3 Sec. 8. Section 12.51, subsection 2, paragraph b, 4 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 (4) A recipient shall receive no more than one disbursement 6 under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (3), subparagraph division 7 (b). 8 Sec. 9. Section 15.274, Code 2026, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 15.274 Promotional program for national historic landmarks 11 and cultural and entertainment districts. 12 The economic development authority, in cooperation with 13 the state department of transportation, shall establish 14 and administer a program designed to promote knowledge of 15 and access to buildings, sites, districts, structures, and 16 objects located in this state that have been designated by the 17 secretary of the interior of the United States as a national 18 historic landmark, unless the national historic landmark is 19 protected under section 22.7, subsection 20 . The program 20 shall be designed to maximize the visibility and visitation of 21 national historic landmarks in this state. Methods used to 22 maximize the visibility and visitation of such locations may 23 include the use of tourism literature, signage on highways, 24 maps of the state and cities, and internet sites. For purposes 25 of this section , âhighwayâ means the same as defined in section 26 325A.1 . 27 Sec. 10. Section 15.436, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 1. The economic development authority shall, pursuant 30 to section 15.106A, subsection 1 , paragraph âoâ , establish 31 the arts and culture enhancement fund to be used for the 32 purposes of this section . The fund shall consist of any moneys 33 appropriated by the general assembly for purposes of this 34 section and any other moneys that are lawfully available to 35 -3- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 3/ 44 H.F. _____ the authority. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , 1 interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall accrue to 2 the authority and shall be used for purposes of this section . 3 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund at the end of 4 each fiscal year shall not revert to any other fund but shall 5 remain in the fund for expenditure for subsequent fiscal years. 6 Sec. 11. Section 16.230, Code 2026, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 16.230 Definitions. 9 As used in this part: 10 1. âDepartmentâ means the department of homeland security 11 and emergency management. 12 2. âFundâ means the natural hazard mitigation revolving loan 13 fund created in section 29D.4 . 14 3. âLoan recipientâ means the same as defined in section 15 29D.2 . 16 4. âProgramâ means the natural hazard mitigation financing 17 program created in section 29D.3 . 18 5. âProjectâ means the same as defined in section 29D.2 . 19 Sec. 12. Section 28E.9, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 2. In any case or controversy involving performance or 22 interpretation of, or liability under, the agreement, the 23 public agencies that are party to the agreement shall be real 24 parties in interest, and the state may maintain an action 25 to recoup or otherwise make itself whole for any damages or 26 liability which it may incur by reason of being joined as a 27 party therein. Such action shall be maintainable against 28 any public agency or agencies whose default, failure of 29 performance, or other conduct caused or contributed to the 30 incurring of damage or liability by the state. 31 Sec. 13. Section 49.128, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 32 to read as follows: 33 1. a. No later than twenty days following an election, the 34 commissioner shall place on file in the commissionerâs office a 35 -4- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 4/ 44 H.F. _____ certification that the county met the following requirements at 1 the election: 2 a. (1) The testing of voting equipment was performed, as 3 required under section 52.35 . 4 b. (2) The election personnel training course was 5 conducted, as required under section 49.124 . 6 c. (3) Polling places met accessibility standards, as 7 required under section 49.21 . 8 d. (4) The schedule of required publications was adhered 9 to, as required under section 49.53 . 10 e. (5) The commissioner has complied with administrative 11 rules adopted by the state commissioner under chapter 52 , 12 including having a written voting system security plan. 13 f. b. The state commissioner may adopt rules pursuant 14 to chapter 17A to require that the commissioner provide and 15 certify additional information. 16 Sec. 14. Section 84A.1B, subsection 3, unnumbered paragraph 17 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 Create, and update as necessary, a list of high-demand jobs 19 statewide for purposes of the future ready Iowa registered 20 apprenticeship programs created in chapter 84F , the summer 21 youth intern pilot program established under section 84A.12 , 22 the Iowa employer innovation program established under section 23 84A.13 , the future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar 24 scholarship program established under section 256.228 , the 25 future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant program established 26 under section 256.229 , and postsecondary summer classes 27 for high school students as provided under section 261E.8, 28 subsection 8 . In addition to the list created by the workforce 29 development board under this subsection , each community 30 college, in consultation with regional career and technical 31 education planning partnerships, and with the approval of the 32 board of directors of the community college, may identify and 33 maintain a list of not more than five regional high-demand jobs 34 in the community college region, and shall share the lists 35 -5- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 5/ 44 H.F. _____ with the workforce development board. The lists submitted 1 by community colleges under the this subsection may be used 2 in that community college region for purposes of programs 3 identified under this subsection . The workforce development 4 board shall have full discretion to select and prioritize 5 statewide high-demand jobs after consulting with business and 6 education stakeholders, as appropriate, and seeking public 7 comment. The workforce development board may add to the list 8 of high-demand jobs as it deems necessary. For purposes of 9 this subsection , âhigh-demand jobâ means a job in the state 10 that the board, or a community college in accordance with this 11 subsection , has identified in accordance with this subsection . 12 In creating a list under this subsection , the following 13 criteria, at a minimum, shall apply: 14 Sec. 15. Section 99G.31, subsection 3, paragraph g, 15 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 A ticket or share issued by the division shall not be 18 purchased by and no a prize shall not be paid to any of the 19 following: 20 Sec. 16. Section 99G.31, subsection 3, paragraph h, 21 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 A ticket or share issued by the division shall not be 24 purchased by and no a prize shall not be paid to any of the 25 following: 26 Sec. 17. Section 123.31C, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 1. A person holding a special class âCâ retail native 29 wine license may sell beer and native wine only at retail for 30 consumption on or off the premises. Sales of beer Beer and 31 native wine sold for consumption off the premises made pursuant 32 to this section shall be made sold in original containers 33 except as provided in subsection 5 . A sale of a mixed drink 34 or cocktail that does not contain alcoholic liquor may be sold 35 -6- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 6/ 44 H.F. _____ for consumption off the premises subject to the requirements of 1 section 123.49, subsection 2 , paragraph âdâ . 2 Sec. 18. Section 135C.2, subsection 6, unnumbered paragraph 3 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 The department shall establish a special classification 5 within the residential care facility category for residential 6 care facilities which have the primary purpose of serving 7 pediatric palliative care patients and that only provides 8 provide respite care services and the services of a hospice 9 program as defined in section 135J.1 . A facility within the 10 special classification established pursuant to this subsection 11 shall be exempt from section 135.62 . The department shall 12 adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A which shall include but not 13 be limited to all of the following: 14 Sec. 19. Section 135C.2, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 8. The rules adopted by the department regarding nursing 17 facilities shall provide that a nursing facility may choose 18 to be inspected either by the department or by the joint 19 commission. The rules regarding acceptance of inspection by 20 the joint commission shall include recognition, in lieu of 21 inspection by the department, of comparable inspections and 22 inspection findings of the joint commission, if the department 23 is provided with copies of all requested materials relating 24 to the inspection process. This subsection is effective upon 25 passage of federal legislation in accordance with 1996 Iowa 26 Acts, ch. 1053, Â§3. 27 Sec. 20. Section 135C.6, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 28 amended to read as follows: 29 10. Notwithstanding section 135C.9 , nursing facilities 30 which are accredited by the joint commission shall be licensed 31 without inspection by the department, if the nursing facility 32 has chosen to be inspected by the joint commission in lieu of 33 inspection by the department. This subsection is effective 34 upon passage of federal legislation in accordance with 1996 35 -7- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 7/ 44 H.F. _____ Iowa Acts, ch. 1053, Â§3. 1 Sec. 21. Section 135C.24, subsections 1, 2, and 4, Code 2 2026, are amended to read as follows: 3 1. No A health care facility, and no an owner, 4 administrator, employee , or representative thereof , shall not 5 act as guardian, trustee , or conservator for any resident of 6 such facility, or any of such residentâs property, unless such 7 resident is related to the person acting as guardian within the 8 third degree of consanguinity. 9 2. A health care facility shall provide for the safekeeping 10 of personal effects, funds , and other property of its 11 residents, provided that whenever necessary for the protection 12 of valuables or in order to avoid unreasonable responsibility 13 therefor, the facility may require that they be excluded or 14 removed from the premises of the facility and kept at some 15 place not subject to the control of the facility. 16 4. Any funds or other property belonging to or due a 17 resident, or expendable for the residentâs account, which are 18 received by a health care facility shall be trust funds, shall 19 be kept separate from the funds and property of the facility 20 and of its other residents, or specifically credited to such 21 resident, and shall be used or otherwise expended only for 22 the account of the resident. Upon request the facility shall 23 furnish the resident, the guardian, trustee , or conservator, 24 if any, for any resident, or any governmental unit or private 25 charitable agency contributing funds or other property on 26 account of any resident, a complete and certified statement of 27 all funds or other property to which this subsection applies 28 detailing the amounts and items received, together with their 29 sources and disposition. 30 Sec. 22. Section 135H.5, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 2. An application for a license shall be accompanied by the 33 required license fee which shall be credited to the general 34 fund of the state. The initial application fee and the annual 35 -8- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 8/ 44 H.F. _____ license fee is are twenty-five dollars. 1 Sec. 23. Section 148.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 1. The board, after due notice and hearing in accordance 4 with chapter 17A , may issue an order to discipline a licensee 5 for any of the grounds set forth in section 147.55 , chapter 6 272C , or this subsection section . Notwithstanding section 7 272C.3 , licensee discipline may include a civil penalty not to 8 exceed ten thousand dollars. 9 Sec. 24. Section 169.13, subsection 3, paragraph h, Code 10 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 h. Demonstrating an inability to practice veterinary 12 medicine with reasonable skill and safety by reason of illness, 13 drunkenness, excessive use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or 14 other type of material , or as a result of a mental or physical 15 condition. 16 Sec. 25. Section 187.201, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department and 19 shall be used exclusively to administer the programs created 20 in this subchapter III as determined and directed by the 21 department, and shall not require further special authorization 22 by the general assembly. 23 Sec. 26. Section 187.331, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 24 2026, is amended to read as follows: 25 a. A farm or business that owns or operates the farm source 26 shall be given a preference to participate in the program 27 if the farm or business is currently participating in the 28 choose Iowa promotional program as provided in this part 1 29 of this subchapter III . Otherwise, a farm or business may 30 participate in the program if the farm or business has applied 31 to participate in the choose Iowa promotional program and the 32 department determines that the application will be approved. 33 Sec. 27. Section 189A.2, subsection 1, paragraph b, 34 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -9- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 9/ 44 H.F. _____ (4) If it bears or contains any color additive which is 1 unsafe within the meaning of section 706 of the Federal Food, 2 Drug, and Cosmetic Act; however, an article which is not 3 otherwise deemed adulterated under subparagraph (2) , or (3) , 4 or (4) of under this paragraph subparagraph shall nevertheless 5 be deemed adulterated if use of the pesticide chemical, food 6 additive, or color additive in or on such article is prohibited 7 by regulations of the secretary in official establishments. 8 Sec. 28. Section 200.3, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 5. âBrandâ means a term, design, trademark, product name, 11 or other specific designation under which a an individual 12 beneficial substance or commercial fertilizer is offered for 13 sale. 14 Sec. 29. Section 200.3, subsection 22, Code 2026, is amended 15 to read as follows: 16 22. âNuisance action or proceedingâ means an action, 17 claim , or proceeding brought at law, in equity, or as an 18 administrative proceeding, which is based on nuisance. 19 Sec. 30. Section 200.6, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 20 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 e. All fertilizers distributed or stored in bulk, unless in 22 the manufacturers manufacturerâs authorized containers, shall 23 be labeled as the responsibility of the possessor. 24 Sec. 31. Section 200.10, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 1. It shall be the duty of the The secretary, who 27 may act through an authorized agent, to shall sample, 28 inspect, make analysis of, and test commercial fertilizers 29 or beneficial substances distributed within this state 30 at time and place and to such an extent as the secretary 31 may deem necessary, to determine whether such commercial 32 fertilizers or beneficial substances are in compliance with 33 the provisions of this chapter . In the performance of the 34 foregoing duty, the secretary may consult with the director 35 -10- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 10/ 44 H.F. _____ of the Iowa agricultural experimental station in respect 1 to the time, place, and extent of sampling. The secretary 2 acting individually or through an agent is authorized to enter 3 upon any public or private premises or conveyances during 4 regular business hours in order to have access to a commercial 5 fertilizer or beneficial substance subject to the provisions of 6 this chapter including in rules adopted by the department under 7 this chapter . The secretary shall maintain a laboratory with 8 the necessary equipment and to employ such employees as may be 9 necessary to assist in the administration and enforcement of 10 this chapter . 11 Sec. 32. Section 203.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 1. âBondâ means a bond issued by a surety company or an 14 irrevocable letter of credit issued by a financial institution 15 described in subsection 9 . 16 Sec. 33. Section 203D.1, subsection 20, paragraph a, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. âSellerâ means a person who sells grain , that the person 19 has produced or caused to be produced , to a licensed grain 20 dealer. 21 Sec. 34. Section 203D.6, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 22 2026, is amended to read as follows: 23 b. A depositor filing a claim for a dollar value loss 24 under this subsection shall be bound by the dollar value 25 loss determined by the board. The dollar value loss is the 26 outstanding balance on the validated claim at the time the 27 claimant is indemnified from the fund. 28 Sec. 35. Section 217.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 217.4 Meetings of council. 31 Meetings shall be called by the chairperson or upon written 32 request of any three council members as necessary to carry out 33 the duties of the council. The chairperson shall preside at 34 all meetings or , in the absence of the chairperson , the vice 35 -11- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 11/ 44 H.F. _____ chairperson shall preside. The members of the council shall 1 be paid a per diem as specified in section 7E.6 and their 2 reasonable and necessary expenses. 3 Sec. 36. Section 217.31, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 1. Any person may institute a civil action for damages under 6 chapter 669 or to restrain the dissemination of confidential 7 records set out in section 217.30, subsection 2 , paragraph 8 âbâ , âcâ , or âdâ , in violation of that section, and any person, 9 agency , or governmental body proven to have disseminated or to 10 have requested and received confidential records in violation 11 of section 217.30, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , âcâ , or âdâ , 12 shall be liable for actual damages and exemplary damages for 13 each violation and shall be liable for court costs, expenses, 14 and reasonable attorney fees incurred by the party bringing the 15 action. In no case shall the award for damages be less than one 16 hundred dollars. 17 Sec. 37. Section 225.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 225.2 Name State psychiatric hospital name ââ location. 20 It The hospital established in section 225.1 shall be known 21 as the state psychiatric hospital, and shall be located at Iowa 22 City, and integrated with the university of Iowa college of 23 medicine and university hospital of the state university of 24 Iowa. 25 Sec. 38. Section 225.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 225.3 Under control of state State board of regents control . 28 The state board of regents shall have full power to manage, 29 control, and govern the said state psychiatric hospital the 30 same as other institutions already under its control. 31 Sec. 39. Section 225A.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, 32 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (d), Code 2026, is 33 amended to read as follows: 34 (d) Is consistent with the departmentâs agency strategic 35 -12- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 12/ 44 H.F. _____ plan adopted pursuant to section 8E.206 8E.204 . 1 Sec. 40. Section 231.4, subsection 1, paragraph i, Code 2 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 3 Sec. 41. Section 232.77, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 4 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 d. Whenever the person is required to report under section 6 232.69 in that personâs capacity as a member of the staff of 7 a medical or other private or public institution, agency , or 8 facility, that person shall immediately notify the person in 9 charge of the institution, agency, or facility or that personâs 10 designated delegate of the need for photographs, X rays, 11 physical assessments, or other tests. 12 Sec. 42. Section 237.9, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 13 is amended to read as follows: 14 A person who receives information from or through the 15 department shall not disclose that information directly or 16 indirectly, except as authorized by section 217.30 , or as 17 authorized or required by section 232.69 , if the information 18 concerns any of the following: 19 Sec. 43. Section 237A.5, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 20 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 e. Controlled medical conditions which that would not affect 22 the performance of the employee in the capacity employed shall 23 not prohibit employment. 24 Sec. 44. Section 249A.26, subsection 7, Code 2026, is 25 amended to read as follows: 26 7. Notwithstanding section 8.39 , the department may 27 transfer funds appropriated for the medical assistance program 28 to a separate account established in the departmentâs case 29 management unit in an amount necessary to pay for expenditures 30 required to provide case management for mental health and 31 disabilities disability services under the medical assistance 32 program which are jointly funded by the state and county, 33 pending final settlement of the expenditures. Funds received 34 by the case management unit in settlement of the expenditures 35 -13- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 13/ 44 H.F. _____ shall be used to replace the transferred funds and are 1 available for the purposes for which the funds were originally 2 appropriated. 3 Sec. 45. Section 252E.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 1. An order requiring the provision of coverage under a 6 health benefit plan other than public coverage is authorization 7 for enrollment of the dependent if the dependent is otherwise 8 eligible to be enrolled. The dependentâs eligibility and 9 enrollment for coverage under such a plan shall be governed by 10 all applicable terms and conditions , including , but not limited 11 to , eligibility and insurability standards. The dependent, if 12 eligible, shall be provided the same coverage as the obligor. 13 Sec. 46. Section 252E.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 1. A child is eligible for medical support for the duration 16 of the obligorâs child support obligation. However, the 17 childâs eligibility for coverage under a health benefit plan 18 shall be governed by all applicable plan provisions including , 19 but not limited to , eligibility and insurability standards. 20 Sec. 47. Section 252E.7, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 4. The insurer shall have immunity from any liability, 23 civil or criminal, which might otherwise be incurred or imposed 24 for actions taken in implementing this section including , but 25 not limited to , the insurerâs release of any information, or 26 the payment of any claims for services by the insurer, or the 27 insurerâs acceptance of applications for enrollment of the 28 dependent and medical expense claims for the dependent which 29 are signed by the obligee or an employee of the department 30 pursuant to this section . 31 Sec. 48. Section 252E.9, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 32 to read as follows: 33 2. For cases for which services are being provided 34 pursuant to chapter 252B , the obligor shall notify the 35 -14- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 14/ 44 H.F. _____ obligee and the department within ten days of a change in 1 the terms or conditions of coverage under a health benefit 2 plan. Such changes may include , but are not limited to , a 3 change in deductibles, coinsurance, preadmission notification 4 requirements, coverage for dental, optical, office visits, 5 prescription drugs, inpatient and outpatient hospitalization, 6 and any other changes which materially affect the coverage. 7 Costs incurred by the obligee or the department as a result of 8 the obligorâs failure to provide notification as required are 9 recoverable from the obligor. 10 Sec. 49. Section 256.11, subsection 9, paragraph d, Code 11 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 12 Sec. 50. Section 256.189, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 3. An Iowa tuition grants fund is established in the state 15 treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission 16 and shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general 17 assembly and other moneys received by the commission for 18 deposit in the fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated 19 to the commission for purposes of providing tuition grants 20 to qualified students who are enrolled in accredited private 21 institutions. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund 22 at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general 23 fund of the state but shall remain available for expenditure 24 for purposes of providing tuition grants to qualified students 25 who are enrolled in accredited private institutions for 26 subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 27 subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall 28 be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the commission 29 for purposes of administering any scholarship or grant program 30 described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . 31 Sec. 51. Section 256.191, subsection 8, Code 2026, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 8. Fund established. An Iowa tuition grants for-profit 34 institutions fund is established in the state treasury. The 35 -15- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 15/ 44 H.F. _____ fund shall be administered by the commission and shall consist 1 of moneys appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys 2 received by the commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys 3 in the fund are appropriated to the commission for purposes of 4 providing tuition grants to qualified students who are enrolled 5 in eligible institutions. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys 6 in the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 7 to the general fund of the state but shall remain available 8 for expenditure for purposes of providing tuition grants to 9 qualified students who are enrolled in eligible institutions 10 for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 11 subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall 12 be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the commission 13 for purposes of administering any scholarship or grant program 14 described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . 15 Sec. 52. Section 256.192, subsections 8 and 9, Code 2026, 16 are amended by striking the subsections and inserting in lieu 17 thereof the following: 18 8. Each applicant, in accordance with the rules established 19 by the commission, shall: 20 a. Complete and file an application for a 21 vocational-technical tuition grant. 22 b. Be responsible for the submission of the financial 23 information required for evaluation of the applicantâs need for 24 a grant, on forms determined by the commission. 25 c. Report promptly to the commission any information 26 requested. 27 d. Submit a new application and financial statement for 28 reevaluation of the applicantâs eligibility to receive a 29 second-year renewal of the grant. 30 9. A vocational-technical tuition grants fund is 31 established in the state treasury. The fund shall be 32 administered by the commission and shall consist of moneys 33 appropriated by the general assembly and other moneys received 34 by the commission for deposit in the fund. The moneys in 35 -16- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 16/ 44 H.F. _____ the fund are appropriated to the commission for purposes of 1 providing vocational-technical tuition grants pursuant to 2 this section. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the 3 fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to 4 the general fund of the state but shall remain available for 5 expenditure for purposes of providing vocational-technical 6 tuition grants pursuant to this section for subsequent fiscal 7 years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest 8 or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the 9 fund and are appropriated to the commission for purposes of 10 administering any scholarship or grant program described in 11 this part 4 of subchapter VII. 12 Sec. 53. Section 256.194, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 3. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2025, 15 there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to 16 the commission for deposit in the vocational-technical tuition 17 grants fund established in section 256.192, subsection 8 9 , the 18 sum of one million seven hundred fifty thousand one hundred 19 eighty-five dollars. 20 Sec. 54. Section 256.212, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 21 amended to read as follows: 22 6. Fund established. An all Iowa opportunity scholarship 23 fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under 24 the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid 25 into the fund are appropriated and made available to the 26 commission to be used for scholarships for students meeting 27 the requirements of this section . Notwithstanding section 28 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year 29 shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but shall 30 be available for purposes of this section in subsequent fiscal 31 years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest 32 or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund 33 and are appropriated to the college student aid commission 34 for purposes of administering any program described in this 35 -17- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 17/ 44 H.F. _____ subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . 1 Sec. 55. Section 256.216, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3 In administering the program for the community colleges and 4 the accredited private institutions, the commission shall: 5 Sec. 56. Section 256.218, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 6. A teach Iowa scholar fund is established in the state 8 treasury. The fund shall be administered by the commission and 9 shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly 10 and any other moneys received by the commission for deposit 11 in the fund, including payments collected by the commission 12 pursuant to section 256.219, subsection 7 . The moneys in the 13 fund are appropriated to the commission for the teach Iowa 14 scholar program. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in 15 the fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert to 16 the general fund of the state but shall remain available for 17 expenditure for the teach Iowa scholar program for subsequent 18 fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , 19 interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 20 to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid 21 commission for purposes of administering any program described 22 in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . 23 Sec. 57. Section 256.226, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 24 amended to read as follows: 25 10. Trust fund established. A rural veterinary care trust 26 fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund under 27 the control of the commission. The commission may accept 28 gifts, grants, bequests, and other private contributions, as 29 well as state or federal moneys, for deposit in the fund. The 30 commission shall remit all repayments made pursuant to this 31 section to the rural veterinary care trust fund. All moneys 32 deposited or paid into the trust fund are appropriated and 33 made available to the commission to be used for meeting the 34 requirements of this section and increasing the number of 35 -18- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 18/ 44 H.F. _____ veterinarians participating in the program. Moneys in the 1 fund up to the total amount that an eligible individual may 2 receive for an eligible loan in accordance with this section 3 and upon fulfilling the requirements of subsection 4 , shall be 4 considered encumbered for the duration of the agreement entered 5 into pursuant to subsection 4 . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , 6 any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not 7 revert to the general fund of the state, but shall be available 8 for purposes of this section and to increase the number of 9 veterinarians participating in the program in subsequent fiscal 10 years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest 11 or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund 12 and are appropriated to the college student aid commission 13 for purposes of administering any program described in this 14 subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . 15 Sec. 58. Section 256.228, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 16 amended to read as follows: 17 5. Fund created. A future ready Iowa skilled workforce 18 last-dollar scholarship fund is created in the state treasury 19 as a separate fund under the control of the commission. All 20 moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated and 21 made available to the commission to be used for scholarships 22 awarded as provided under this section . Notwithstanding 23 section 8.33 , any balance in the fund on June 30 of each fiscal 24 year shall not revert to the general fund of the state, but 25 shall be available for purposes of this section in subsequent 26 fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , 27 interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 28 to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid 29 commission for purposes of administering any program described 30 in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . 31 Sec. 59. Section 256.229, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 5. Fund created. A future ready Iowa skilled workforce 34 grant fund is created in the state treasury as a separate fund 35 -19- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 19/ 44 H.F. _____ under the control of the commission. All moneys deposited or 1 paid into the fund are appropriated and made available to the 2 commission to be used for grants awarded as provided under this 3 section . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any balance in the fund 4 on June 30 of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general 5 fund of the state, but shall be available for purposes of this 6 section in subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 7 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the 8 fund shall be credited to the fund and are appropriated to the 9 college student aid commission for purposes of administering 10 any program described in this subchapter VII, part 4 of 11 subchapter VII . 12 Sec. 60. Section 256.230, subsection 8, Code 2026, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 8. Fund created. An Iowa workforce grant and incentive 15 program fund is created in the state treasury under the control 16 of the commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the 17 fund are appropriated to the commission to be used for grants 18 and incentive payments awarded as provided in this section . 19 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys in the fund that remain 20 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall 21 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 22 purposes designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 23 2 , interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 24 to the fund and are appropriated to the college student aid 25 commission for purposes of administering any program described 26 in this subchapter VII, part 4 of subchapter VII . 27 Sec. 61. Section 256A.3, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are 28 amended to read as follows: 29 2. Establish minimum guidelines for comprehensive 30 early child development services for at-risk three-year- 31 three-year-old and four-year-old children. The guidelines 32 shall reflect current research findings on the necessary 33 components for cost-effective child development services. 34 3. At least biennially, develop an inventory of child 35 -20- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 20/ 44 H.F. _____ development services provided to at-risk three-year- 1 three-year-old and four-year-old children in this state and 2 identify the number of children receiving and not receiving 3 these services, the types of programs under which the services 4 are received, the degree to which each program meets the 5 councilâs minimum guidelines for a comprehensive program, and 6 the reasons children not receiving the services are not being 7 served. The council is not required to conduct independent 8 research in developing the inventory, but shall determine 9 information needs necessary to provide a more complete 10 inventory. 11 Sec. 62. Section 256B.3, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 4. To purchase and otherwise acquire special equipment, 14 appliances , and other aids for use in special education, and to 15 loan or lease the same under such rules and regulations as the 16 department may prescribe. 17 Sec. 63. Section 256B.4, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are 18 amended to read as follows: 19 2. The board of directors of the local school district 20 or the area education agency shall employ qualified teachers 21 certified by the authority provided by law as teachers for 22 children requiring such special education. The maximum number 23 of pupils per teacher shall be determined by the board of 24 directors of the local school district or the area education 25 agency board in accordance with the rules and regulations of 26 the state board of education. 27 3. The board of directors of the local school district or 28 the area education agency may establish and operate one or more 29 special education centers to provide diagnostic, therapeutic, 30 corrective, and other services, on a more comprehensive, 31 expert, economical, and efficient basis than can be reasonably 32 provided by a single school district. The services, if offered 33 by the area education agency board, may be provided in the 34 regular schools using personnel and equipment of the area 35 -21- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 21/ 44 H.F. _____ education agency or, if it is impractical or inefficient to 1 provide them on the premises of a regular school, the area 2 education agency may provide services in its own facilities. 3 To the maximum extent feasible, centers shall be established 4 at and in conjunction with, or in close proximity to, one or 5 more elementary and secondary schools. Local school districts 6 or the area education agencies may accept diagnostic and 7 evaluation studies conducted by other individuals, hospitals, 8 or centers, if determined to be competent. Children requiring 9 special education services may be identified in any way that 10 the department of education determines to be reliable. Centers 11 established pursuant to this section may contain classrooms 12 and other educational facilities and equipment to supplement 13 instruction and other services to children with disabilities 14 in the regular schools, and to provide separate instruction to 15 children whose degree or type of educational disability makes 16 it impractical or inappropriate for them to participate in 17 classes with normal children. 18 Sec. 64. Section 256F.3, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 b. To receive approval to establish an innovation zone 21 school in accordance with this chapter , an innovation zone 22 consortium shall submit an application to the state board which 23 that demonstrates the support of at least fifty percent of 24 the teachers employed at each proposed innovation zone school 25 on the date of the submission of the application and fifty 26 percent of the parents or guardians voting whose children are 27 enrolled at each proposed innovation zone school, provided 28 that a majority of the parents or guardians eligible to vote 29 participate in the ballot process, according to procedures 30 established by rules of the state board. 31 Sec. 65. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, paragraph u, Code 32 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 u. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 34 280.9A, subsection 2 , related relating to the administration of 35 -22- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 22/ 44 H.F. _____ a civics test in the same manner as a school district. 1 Sec. 66. Section 256F.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 256F.9 Procedures after revocation ââ student enrollment. 4 If a charter school or innovation zone school contract is 5 revoked in accordance with this chapter , a nonresident student 6 who attended the school, and any siblings of the student , may 7 submit an application to another school district according to 8 section 282.18 . Applications and notices required by section 9 282.18 shall be processed and provided in a prompt manner. 10 Sec. 67. Section 260I.6, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 11 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 The program is aligned with a certificate, diploma, or 13 degree for credit , ; is either not offered for credit or is 14 offered for short-term credit that is not eligible under the 15 federal Pell grant program , ; and does any of the following: 16 Sec. 68. Section 273.2, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. In-service training programs for employees of school 19 districts and area education agencies, provided at the time 20 programs and services are established they do not duplicate 21 programs and services available in that area from the 22 universities under the state board of regents and from other 23 universities and four-year institutions of higher education in 24 Iowa. The in-service training programs shall include but are 25 not limited to regular training concerning mental or emotional 26 disorders which that may afflict children and the impact 27 children with such disorders have upon their families. 28 Sec. 69. Section 273.2, subsection 7, Code 2026, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 7. The board of directors of an area education agency shall 31 not establish programs and services which duplicate programs 32 and services which that are or may be provided by the community 33 colleges under the provisions of chapter 260C . An area 34 education agency shall contract, whenever practicable, with 35 -23- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 23/ 44 H.F. _____ other school corporations for the use of personnel, buildings, 1 facilities, supplies, equipment, programs, and services. 2 Sec. 70. Section 273.2, subsection 14, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 14. The area education agency shall provide an annual report 5 by January 1 of each year to the department of education, and 6 to public schools and nonpublic schools located within the 7 area education agencyâs boundaries which that are on the list 8 of accredited schools pursuant to section 256.11 , a detailed 9 description of the educational services, special education 10 programs and services, professional development services, and 11 media services that the area education agency provides, and the 12 cost associated with purchasing such programs and services from 13 the area education agency. 14 Sec. 71. Section 273.3, subsection 14, paragraphs c and d, 15 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 16 c. The board may make elective deferrals in accordance with 17 the plan as authorized by an eligible employee for the purpose 18 of making contributions to the investment contract on behalf of 19 the employee. The deferrals shall be made in the manner which 20 that will qualify contributions to the investment contract for 21 the benefits under section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, 22 as defined in section 422.3 . In addition, the board may make 23 nonelective employer contributions to the plan. 24 d. As used in this subsection , unless the context otherwise 25 requires, âinvestment contractâ shall mean a custodial account 26 utilizing mutual funds or an annuity contract which that meets 27 the requirements of section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue 28 Code, as defined in section 422.3 . 29 Sec. 72. Section 273.3, subsection 24, Code 2026, is amended 30 to read as follows: 31 24. Be authorized to sell software and support services, 32 professional development programs and materials, online 33 professional development, and online training to entities 34 other than school districts within the state and to school 35 -24- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 24/ 44 H.F. _____ districts and other public agencies located outside of the 1 state. The board may also sell to school districts within this 2 state software and support services, professional development 3 programs and materials, online professional development, and 4 online training which that the area education agency is not 5 otherwise required to provide to a school district under this 6 chapter or chapter 256B or 257 . 7 Sec. 73. Section 273.5, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 8 is amended to read as follows: 9 There shall be established a division of special education 10 of the area education agency which that shall provide for 11 special education programs and services to the local school 12 districts. The division of special education shall be headed 13 by a director of special education who meets certification 14 standards of the department of education. The director of 15 special education shall be an employee of the division of 16 special education of the department of education. The director 17 of special education shall not be an employee of the area 18 education agency, shall not receive compensation from the area 19 education agency, shall not supervise or manage employees of 20 the area education agency, and shall not directly provide 21 special education services for the agency. The director of 22 special educationâs primary job duties and responsibilities to 23 the area education agency are to provide oversight of the area 24 education agencyâs special education services. The director 25 of special education shall also have the responsibility for 26 implementation of state regulations and guidelines relating 27 to special education programs and services. The director of 28 special education shall have the following powers and duties: 29 Sec. 74. Section 275.25, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 a. The number of directors of a school district is either 32 five or seven as provided in section 275.12 . In school 33 districts that include a city of fifteen thousand or more 34 population as shown by the most recent decennial federal 35 -25- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 25/ 44 H.F. _____ decennial census, the board shall consist of seven members 1 elected in the manner provided in subsection 3 . If it becomes 2 necessary to increase the membership of a board, two directors 3 shall be added according to the procedure described in section 4 277.23 . 5 Sec. 75. Section 282.30, subsection 1, paragraph a, 6 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 (1) An approved or licensed juvenile shelter care home, as 8 defined in section 232.2, subsection 40 . 9 Sec. 76. Section 284.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 10 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 a. For purposes of comprehensive evaluations, standards , and 12 criteria which that measure a beginning teacherâs performance 13 against the Iowa teaching standards specified in subsection 1 , 14 and the criteria for the Iowa teaching standards developed by 15 the department in accordance with section 256.9 , to determine 16 whether the teacherâs practice meets the requirements specified 17 for a career teacher. These standards and criteria shall be 18 set forth in an instrument provided by the department. The 19 comprehensive evaluation and instrument are not subject to 20 negotiations or grievance procedures pursuant to chapter 20 or 21 determinations made by the board of directors under section 22 279.14 . 23 Sec. 77. Section 284.6, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 4. In cooperation with the teacherâs evaluator, the 26 career teacher employed by a school district shall develop 27 an individual teacher professional development plan. The 28 evaluator shall consult with the teacherâs supervisor on the 29 development of the individual teacher professional development 30 plan. The purpose of the plan is to promote individual and 31 group professional development. The individual plan shall 32 be based, at minimum, on the needs of the teacher, the Iowa 33 teaching standards, and the student achievement goals of the 34 attendance center and the school district. The individual 35 -26- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 26/ 44 H.F. _____ plan shall include goals for the individual which that are 1 beyond those required under the attendance center professional 2 development plan developed pursuant to subsection 7 . 3 Sec. 78. Section 284.16, subsection 1, paragraph d, 4 subparagraph (7), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 (7) Actively participate in collaborative problem solving 6 and reflective practices which that include but are not limited 7 to professional study groups, peer observations, grade level 8 planning, and weekly team meetings. 9 Sec. 79. Section 321.194, subsection 4, paragraph b, 10 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 (3) To participate in extracurricular activities. If the 12 licensee receives competent private instruction or independent 13 private instruction and participates in an extracurricular 14 activity at another school, the licensee may drive to the 15 location of the extracurricular activity regardless of whether 16 the licensee is enrolled at the school. 17 Sec. 80. Section 321.194, subsection 6, paragraph c, Code 18 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 c. If the applicant receives competent private instruction 20 or independent private instruction , the certification must be 21 made by the applicantâs primary instructor. 22 Sec. 81. Section 359.27, Code 2026, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 359.27 Payment of funds. 25 County treasurers are hereby authorized to pay over to the 26 treasurers or clerks of cities which come under the provisions 27 of sections 359.24 , 359.25 , and 359.26 all funds which that 28 would otherwise be paid over to the township clerks of such 29 townships. 30 Sec. 82. Section 422.11F, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 2. The taxes imposed under this subchapter , less the credits 33 allowed under section 422.12 , shall be reduced by investment 34 tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 15.496 and 15.508 35 -27- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 27/ 44 H.F. _____ and 15.496 . 1 Sec. 83. Section 422.12, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 2 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3 c. âPrivate instructionâ means independent private 4 instruction as defined in section 299A.1, subsection 2 , 5 paragraph âbâ , competent private instruction under section 6 299A.2 , or competent private instruction provided to a resident 7 of this state by a nonlicensed person under section 299A.3 . 8 Sec. 84. Section 422.20, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 9 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 a. Unless otherwise expressly permitted by section 8G.4 , 11 section 11.41 , section 96.11, subsection 6 , section 421.17, 12 subsections 22, 23, and 26 , section 421.17, subsection 27 , 13 paragraph âkâ , section 421.17, subsection 31 , section 252B.9 , 14 section 321.40, subsection 6 , sections 321.120 , 421.19 , 421.28 , 15 421.59 , 421.65 , 422.72 , and 452A.63 , and section 556.19, 16 subsection 2 , this section , or another provision of law, a 17 tax return, return information, or investigative or audit 18 information shall not be divulged to any person or entity, 19 other than the taxpayer, the department, or internal revenue 20 service for use in a matter unrelated to tax administration. 21 Sec. 85. Section 422.33, subsection 12, paragraph b, Code 22 2026, is amended to read as follows: 23 b. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced 24 by investment tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 25 15.496 and 15.508 and 15.496 . 26 Sec. 86. Section 422.60, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 27 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 b. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced 29 by investment tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 30 15.496 and 15.508 and 15.496 . 31 Sec. 87. Section 422.72, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 32 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 a. Unless otherwise expressly permitted by section 8G.4 , 34 section 11.41 , section 96.11, subsection 6 , section 421.17, 35 -28- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 28/ 44 H.F. _____ subsections 22, 23, and 26 , section 421.17, subsection 27 , 1 paragraph âkâ , section 421.17, subsection 31 , section 252B.9 , 2 section 321.40, subsection 6 , sections 321.120 , 421.19 , 421.28 , 3 421.65 , 422.20 , and 452A.63 , and section 556.19, subsection 2 , 4 this section , or another provision of law, a tax return, return 5 information, or investigative or audit information shall not 6 be divulged to any person or entity, other than the taxpayer, 7 the department, or internal revenue service for use in a matter 8 unrelated to tax administration. 9 Sec. 88. Section 423.3, subsection 47A, paragraph b, 10 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 (2) âCompetitive local exchange service providerâ means 12 any person, including a municipal utility, that provides 13 local exchange services, other than a local exchange carrier 14 or a non-rate-regulated wireline provider of local exchange 15 services under an authorized certificate of public convenience 16 and necessity within a specific geographic area described in 17 maps filed with and approved by the Iowa utilities comission 18 commission as of September 30, 1992. 19 Sec. 89. Section 423.4, subsection 8, paragraph a, 20 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 The owner of a data center business, as defined in section 23 423.3, subsection 95 , paragraph âeâ âfâ , located in this state 24 that is not eligible for the exemption under section 423.3, 25 subsection 95 , may make an annual application to the department 26 for the refund of fifty percent of the sales or use tax upon all 27 of the following: 28 Sec. 90. Section 432.12C, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 29 amended to read as follows: 30 2. The taxes imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by 31 investment tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 15.496 32 and 15.508 and 15.496 . 33 Sec. 91. Section 441.21, subsection 5, paragraph f, 34 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -29- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 29/ 44 H.F. _____ (2) âParcelâ means the same as defined in section 445.1 . 1 âParcelâ also means that portion of a parcel assigned a 2 classification of commercial property or industrial property 3 pursuant to section 441.21, subsection 14 , paragraph âbâ . 4 Sec. 92. Section 455G.32, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 2. a. Notwithstanding subsection 1 , a retail dealer 7 may install, replace, or convert any part of the gasoline 8 infrastructure beginning at a point where the shear valve 9 ends and continuing until the point where the dispenser 10 breakaway ends that is incompatible with E-85 gasoline. 11 However, beginning January 1, 2026, that part of the gasoline 12 infrastructure must be compatible with the following: ethanol 13 blended gasoline classified as E-40 or higher. 14 (1) (a) Ethanol blended gasoline classified as E-15 or 15 higher. 16 (b) This subparagraph is repealed January 1, 2026. 17 (2) (a) Ethanol blended gasoline classified as E-40 or 18 higher. 19 (b) This subparagraph shall be implemented beginning 20 January 1, 2026. 21 b. This subsection is repealed July 1, 2030. 22 Sec. 93. Section 462A.9, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 4. Every motorboat of class II, III , or IV shall be provided 25 with an efficient whistle or other sound producing appliance. 26 Sec. 94. Section 462A.9, subsection 8, paragraph a, Code 27 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 a. The provisions of subsections 4, 5 , and 7 of this 29 section shall not apply to motorboats while competing in any 30 race conducted pursuant to section 462A.16 or, if such boats 31 are designed and used solely for racing, while engaged in such 32 navigation as is incidental to the tuning up of the boats and 33 engines for the race. 34 Sec. 95. Section 462A.9, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended 35 -30- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 30/ 44 H.F. _____ to read as follows: 1 9. Every motorboat shall have the carburetor or carburetors 2 of every engine therein, except outboard motors, using a liquid 3 of a volatile nature as fuel, equipped with such efficient 4 flame arrestor, backfire trap , or other similar device as may 5 be prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission. 6 Sec. 96. Section 462A.17, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 1. This chapter and other applicable laws of this state 9 govern the operation, equipment, numbering , and all other 10 matters relating thereto of any vessel whenever the vessel 11 is operated or maintained on the waters of this state under 12 the jurisdiction of the commission, but this chapter does not 13 prevent the adoption of any ordinance or local law relating 14 to the operation or equipment of vessels. Such ordinances 15 or local law are operative only so long as they are not 16 inconsistent with this chapter or the rules adopted by the 17 commission. 18 Sec. 97. Section 468.106, Code 2026, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 468.106 Construction on or along highway. 21 When a levee or drainage district shall have been 22 established by the board and it shall become necessary or 23 desirable that the levee, ditch, drain, or improvement shall 24 be located and constructed within the limits of any public 25 highway, it the levee, ditch, drain, or improvement shall be 26 so built as not materially to interfere with the public travel 27 thereon on the highway . 28 Sec. 98. Section 468.182, Code 2026, is amended to read as 29 follows: 30 468.182 Preference in leasing. 31 In the event a receiver is appointed for any tract of land, 32 the owner , if actually in possession thereof , shall have the 33 preference to rent the same land . 34 Sec. 99. Section 481A.57, Code 2026, is amended to read as 35 -31- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 31/ 44 H.F. _____ follows: 1 481A.57 Possession and storage. 2 A person having lawful possession of game or fur-bearing 3 animals or their pelts lawfully taken by that person with 4 a valid hunting or trapping license , may hold, possess, or 5 store the game or fur-bearing animals or their pelts in an 6 amount that does not exceed the possession limit for the game 7 or fur-bearing animal , from the date of taking until the day 8 before the first day of the next open season for that game or 9 fur-bearing animal. Any person may possess up to twenty-five 10 pounds of deer venison if the deer was obtained from a lawful 11 source. 12 Sec. 100. Section 493.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 493.12 Applicability of statutes. 15 1. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter , such 16 corporations issuing shares without par value, under the 17 provisions hereof of this chapter , shall be and remain subject 18 to the laws of this state , now or hereafter in force, relating 19 to the formation, regulation, consolidation, or merger, rights, 20 powers , and privileges of corporations organized for pecuniary 21 profit, and all other applicable laws applicable thereto . 22 2. All Acts or parts of Acts providing for the 23 incorporation, organization, administration , and management 24 of the affairs of corporations organized for pecuniary profit 25 and having shares of stock with a par value are hereby made 26 applicable to corporations having shares of stock without par 27 value, except where the same enactments are inconsistent with 28 the provisions of this chapter . 29 Sec. 101. Section 501B.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 501B.1 Short title. 32 This Act chapter shall be known and may be cited as the 33 âRevised Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Actâ . 34 Sec. 102. Section 508E.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 35 -32- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 32/ 44 H.F. _____ follows: 1 508E.1 Short title. 2 This Act chapter may be cited as the âViatical Settlements 3 Actâ . 4 Sec. 103. Section 514F.6, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 5 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6 a. A health insurer shall respond to a physician 7 physicianâs , advanced registered nurse practitioner 8 practitionerâs , or physician assistantâs request for 9 credentialing within fifty-six calendar days from the date of 10 the request. 11 Sec. 104. Section 514H.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 1. As used in this section , âasset disregardâ means a one 14 dollar increase in the amount of assets an individual , who is 15 the beneficiary of a qualified long-term care insurance policy 16 and meets the requirements of section 514H.3 , may retain under 17 section 249A.35 for each one dollar of benefit paid out under 18 the individualâs qualified long-term care insurance policy for 19 qualified long-term care services. 20 Sec. 105. Section 519A.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 21 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 a. The association shall submit a plan of operation to 23 the commissioner, together with any amendments necessary 24 or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable 25 administration of the association consistent with sections 26 519A.2 , 519A.3 , this section , and sections 519A.5 through 27 519A.13 . The plan of operation and any amendments thereto 28 shall become effective only after promulgation of the plan or 29 amendment by the commissioner as a rule pursuant to section 30 17A.4 , provided that the initial plan may in the discretion 31 of the commissioner become effective immediately upon filing 32 with the secretary of state administrative rules coordinator 33 pursuant to section 17A.5, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , 34 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a). 35 -33- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 33/ 44 H.F. _____ Sec. 106. Section 533.329, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. The moneys and credits tax imposed under this section 3 shall be reduced by an investment tax credit authorized 4 pursuant to sections 15.496 and 15.508 and 15.496 . 5 Sec. 107. Section 558A.1, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 4. âLead service lineâ means a service line which that is 8 made of lead. A galvanized service line is considered a lead 9 service line if the line ever was or is currently downstream of 10 any lead service line or service line of unknown material. For 11 the purposes of this subsection , âdownstreamâ means the section 12 of the service line between a lead service line and the water 13 meter. 14 Sec. 108. Section 578A.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 578A.1 Short title. 17 This Act chapter shall be known as the âSelf-Service Storage 18 Facilities Actâ . 19 Sec. 109. Section 622.79, Code 2026, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 622.79 When party fails to obey subpoena. 22 In addition to the remedies provided in sections 622.76 23 through 622.78 , if a party to an action in the partyâs own 24 right, on being duly subpoenaed, fails to appear and give 25 testimony, the other party may, at the other partyâs election, 26 have a continuance of the cause at the cost of the delinquent 27 party . 28 Sec. 110. Section 625A.19, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 29 amended to read as follows: 30 1. When the constitutionality of an Act of the Iowa 31 legislature general assembly is drawn into question in any 32 appellate proceeding or further review proceeding to which 33 the general assembly or an officer, agency, or employee 34 thereof is not a party, the majority leader of the senate, 35 -34- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 34/ 44 H.F. _____ the minority leader of the senate, the speaker of the house 1 of representatives, and minority leader of the house of 2 representatives shall each be permitted to file an amicus 3 curiae brief on the constitutionality of the Act. Other 4 members of the general assembly may sign an amicus curiae brief 5 filed pursuant to this subsection . The form of the brief shall 6 be as provided in rule of appellate procedure 6.906 . 7 Sec. 111. Section 633.670, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 6. If the court finds that there are reasonable grounds to 10 believe that the conservator has committed the offense of theft 11 against an older individual under section 714.2A , consumer 12 fraud against an older individual under section 714.16A , elder 13 abuse under section 726.16A 726.24 , financial exploitation of 14 an older individual under section 726.25 , or dependent adult 15 abuse under section 726.26 , the court shall refer the matter 16 to the appropriate county attorney for consideration of the 17 initiation of criminal charges. 18 Sec. 112. Section 668.15A, subsection 3, paragraph j, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 j. Use of an electronic communication device while driving, 21 as described in section 321.276 . 22 Sec. 113. Section 805.8A, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 23 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 c. For violations under section 321L.2A, subsection 3 , 25 sections section 321L.3 , section 321L.4, subsection 2 , and 26 section 321L.7 , the scheduled fine is two hundred dollars. 27 Sec. 114. 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 27, section 4, is amended 28 by striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the 29 following: 30 SEC. 4. Section 724.22, subsections 2, 5, and 8 , Code 2025, 31 are amended to read as follows: 32 2. Except as provided in subsections 4 and subsection 33 5, a person who sells, loans, gives, or makes available a 34 pistol or revolver or ammunition for a pistol or revolver to a 35 -35- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 35/ 44 H.F. _____ person below the age of twenty-one eighteen commits a serious 1 misdemeanor for a first offense and a class âDâ felony for 2 second and subsequent offenses. 3 5. a. A parent , or guardian , or spouse who is twenty-one 4 eighteen years of age or older, of a person under the age of 5 twenty-one eighteen may allow the person, while under direct 6 supervision, to possess a pistol or revolver or the ammunition 7 therefor for any lawful purpose, or while the person receives 8 instruction in the proper use thereof from an instructor 9 twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, with the consent of 10 such parent, guardian , or spouse. 11 b. As used in this section , âdirect supervisionâ means 12 supervision provided by the parent, guardian, spouse, or 13 instructor who is twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, 14 who maintains a physical presence near the supervised person 15 conducive to hands-on instruction, who maintains visual and 16 verbal contact at all times with the supervised person, and who 17 is not intoxicated as provided under the conditions set out 18 in section 321J.2, subsection 1 , or under the influence of an 19 illegal drug. 20 8. A parent, guardian, or spouse , who is twenty-one eighteen 21 years of age or older, of a minor under the age of fourteen 22 years and who allows that minor to possess a pistol or revolver 23 or the ammunition pursuant hereto , shall be strictly liable to 24 an injured party for all damages resulting from the possession 25 of the pistol or revolver or ammunition therefor by that minor. 26 Sec. 115. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. Due to the defined term 27 âdepartmentâ in section 260C.2 and unless the context otherwise 28 requires, the Iowa Code editor shall replace references to the 29 âdepartment of educationâ with âdepartmentâ throughout chapter 30 260C . 31 Sec. 116. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. To conform with other 32 references throughout the Code, the Iowa Code editor is 33 directed to replace references to âdecennial federal censusâ 34 with âfederal decennial censusâ throughout section 423.3 . 35 -36- LSB 5268HC (1) 91 md/ns 36/ 44 H.F. _____